Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-6803
Genetic sequencer; operational and research software for genetic sequencing; disable; remove from facility.

Any medical facility or research facility that is in possession of any genetic sequencer or operational and research software that is described in section 71-6802 shall:

(1) Permanently disable such genetic sequencer or operational and research software; or

(2) Remove such genetic sequencer or operational and research software from any facility associated with such medical facility or research facility.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 34.